Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.270

License moratorium for persons in the service—Rules.

(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the license of any person licensed by the secretary of health to practice a profession or engage in an occupation, if valid and in force and effect at the time the licensee entered service in the armed forces, the United States public health service commissioned corps, or the merchant marine of the United States, shall continue in full force and effect so long as such service continues, unless sooner suspended, canceled, or revoked for cause as provided by law. The secretary shall renew the license of every such person who applies for renewal thereof within six months after being discharged from service with a qualifying discharge as defined in RCW 73.04.005, upon payment of the renewal fee applicable to the then current year or other license period.

(2) If requested by the licensee, the license of a spouse or registered domestic partner of a service member in the United States armed forces, including the United States public health service commissioned corps, if valid and in force and effect at the time the service member is deployed or stationed in a location outside Washington state, must be placed in inactive military spouse or registered domestic partner status so long as such service continues, unless sooner suspended, canceled, or revoked for cause as provided by law. The secretary shall return to active status the license of every such person who applies for renewal thereof within six months after the service member is discharged from service with a qualifying discharge as defined in RCW 73.04.005, or sooner if requested by the licensee, upon payment of the renewal fee applicable to the then current year or other license period.

(3) The secretary may adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.

[ 2024 c 146 s 23; 2012 c 45 s 2; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 321.]

NOTES:

Intent—2024 c 146: See note following RCW 73.04.005.